California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
If any used, rebuilt, or reconditioned parts are supplied, the invoice shall clearly state that fact. If a part of a component system is composed of new and used, rebuilt, or reconditioned parts, the invoice shall clearly state that fact.

One copy of the invoice shall be given to the customer and one copy shall be retained by the repairperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

416.

The invoice shall show the repairperson’s business name and address.

If the repairperson’s telephone number is on the invoice, it shall be the telephone number that appears in any advertisement or on an advertising sign, and shall be the same number as that listed for the repairperson’s firm name and address in the telephone directory, or on the telephone company records if the number is assigned to the repairperson subsequent to the publication of the telephone directory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

417.

Notwithstanding Section 413, upon authorization from the customer as to a specific job, a repairperson may work on a vessel on a time and materials basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

418.

(a) This article does not apply to a vessel in distress which is in need of immediate work critical to its preservation and safety, for which consent cannot expeditiously be obtained.

(b) This section does not include any situation or accident caused to the vessel by the negligence or conduct of the repairperson or the repairperson’s agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Liability, Generally [420. - 432.]

420.

A marine carrier is liable in like manner as an inland carrier, except for loss or injury caused by the perils of the sea or fire.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

421.

The liability of a common carrier by sea is further regulated by acts of Congress.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

422.

Perils of the sea are:

(a) Storms and waves.

(b) Rocks, shoals, and rapids.

(c) Other obstacles, though of human origin.

(d) Changes of climate.

(e) The confinement necessary at sea.

(f) Animals peculiar to the sea.

(g) All other dangers peculiar to the sea.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

423.

A marine carrier shall not stow freight upon deck during the voyage, except where it is usual so to do, nor make any improper deviation from or delay in the voyage, nor do any other unnecessary act which would avoid an insurance in the usual form upon the freight.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

424.

The owner of a vessel is bound to pay to the owner of her cargo the market value, at the time of arrival of the ship at the port of her destination, of that portion of her cargo which has been sold to enable the master to pay for the necessary repairs and supplies of the vessel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

425.

A carrier by water may, when in case of extreme peril it is necessary for the safety of the vessel or cargo, throw overboard, or otherwise sacrifice, any or all of the cargo or appurtenances of the vessel. Throwing property overboard for such purpose is called jettison, and the loss incurred is called a general average loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

426.

So far as possible, a jettison shall begin with the most bulky and least valuable articles.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

427.

A jettison can be made only by authority of the master of a vessel, except in case of his disability, or of an overruling necessity, when it may be made by any other person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

428.

The loss incurred by a jettison, when lawfully made, shall be borne in due proportion by all that part of the vessel, appurtenances, freightage, and cargo for the benefit of which the sacrifice is made, as well as by the owner of the thing sacrificed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

429.

The proportions in which a general average loss is to be borne shall be ascertained by an adjustment, in which the owner of each separate interest shall be charged with that proportion of the value of the thing lost which the value of his part of the property affected bears to the value of the whole. But an adjustment made at the end of the voyage, if valid there, is valid everywhere.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

430.

In estimating values for the purpose of a general average, the vessel and appurtenances shall be valued as at the end of the voyage, the freightage at one-half the amount due on delivery, and the cargo as at the time and place of its discharge; adding, in each case, the amount made good by contribution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

431.

The owner of things stowed on deck, in case of their jettison, is entitled to the benefit of a general average contribution only if it is usual to stow such things on deck upon such a voyage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

432.

The law concerning jettison and general average is equally applicable to every other voluntary sacrifice of property on a vessel, or to an expense necessarily incurred, for the preservation of the vessel and cargo from extraordinary perils.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Liability of Licensed Pilots for San Pedro Bay [440. - 444.]

440.

Pilots holding valid licenses for San Pedro Bay and its approaches and tributaries, their associations, employers, and others providing piloting services in San Pedro Bay are authorized to limit liability for the rendering and performance of those services by contracts or tariffs containing substantially the terms and provisions set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 785, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

441.

The rates and charges for pilotage services do not include insurance covering the vessel or its owners, agents, charterers, or operators from the consequences of negligence of the pilot supplying the pilotage services, the pilot’s employer, or other employees of the pilot’s employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 785, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

442.

Upon reasonable notice from the owners, agents, charterers, or operators, a pilot shall provide insurance covering the vessel, its owners, agents, charterers, or operators from the consequences of negligence of the pilot supplying the pilotage services, the pilot’s employer, or other employees of the pilot’s employer on a trip insurance basis with limits of coverage established by agreement between the pilot and the party requesting the insurance, the premium of which will be assessed in addition to the rates and charges for the pilotage services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 785, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

443.

The election of the owners, agents, charterers, or operators to use a pilot through whom trip insurance could have been obtained shall constitute a binding and irrevocable agreement on the part of the owners, agents, charterers, and operators to the terms and conditions set forth in Section 444.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 785, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

444.

It shall be understood and agreed, and shall be the essence of an agreement under which services of the pilot are tendered to and are accepted by owners, agents, charterers, or operators, as follows:

(a) The vessel requesting pilotage services and its owners, agents, charterers, and operators covenant and agree not to assert a claim against the pilot, the pilot’s employer, or other employees of the pilot’s employer for damages, including any rights over, arising out of, or connected with, directly or indirectly, any damage, loss, or expense sustained by the vessel, its owners, agents, charterers, operators, or crew, and by any third parties, even though resulting in whole or in part from acts, omissions, or negligence of the pilot, the pilot’s employer, or other employees of the pilot’s employer. The vessel and its owners, agents, charterers, and operators further covenant and agree, subject to any limitation of liability to which they are entitled by reason of any contract, bill of lading, statute, or other provision of law in force, to indemnify and hold harmless the pilot, the pilot’s employer, and other employees of the pilot’s employer with respect to liability arising from any and all claims, suits, or actions, by whomsoever asserted, resulting in whole or in part from acts, omissions, or negligence of the pilot, the pilot’s employer, or other employees of the pilot’s employer. These covenants and agreements do not apply to liability and rights that may arise from the willful misconduct or gross negligence of the pilot, the pilot’s employer, or other employees of the pilot’s employer.

(b) If any vessel on whose behalf pilotage services are requested is not owned by the person or entity ordering the services, that person or entity warrants its authority to bind the vessel and its owners, charterers, and operators to all the provisions contained in subdivision (a), and that person and entity agree to indemnify and hold harmless the pilot, the pilot’s employer, and other employees of the pilot’s employer with respect to all losses, damages, and expenses that may be suffered or incurred in consequence of the person or entity not having that authority.

(c) Pilotage services are voluntarily requested and are voluntarily rendered in reliance upon the terms specified in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) This article does not affect the rights of third parties against a vessel, its master, owners, agents, charterers, or operators, or a pilot, the pilot’s employer, or other employees of a pilot’s employer.

(e) This article does not preclude any pilot or pilot’s employer from entering into contracts with the owners, agents, charterers, or operators of a vessel that contain additional pilotage terms and conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 343.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Vessel Traffic Service [445. - 449.5.]

445.

(a) The Marine Exchange of Los Angeles-Long Beach Harbor, Inc., hereafter referred to as the marine exchange, a corporation organized under the Non-Profit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law, Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, may operate a vessel traffic service, in cooperation with, and subject to the supervision of, the United States Coast Guard, for the waters of San Pedro Bay, San Pedro Channel, and Santa Monica Bay, within a radius of 25 nautical miles of the Point Fermin Light. These waters shall be known in this article as the “VTS area.”

(b) This article applies only to the VTS area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 362, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

445.5.

“Covered vessel,” as used in this article, means any of the following:

(a) Every power-driven vessel of 40 meters (approximately 131 feet) or more in length, while navigating.

(b) Every towing vessel of 8 meters (approximately 26 feet) or more in length, while navigating. “Towing vessel,” as used in this article, means any commercial vessel engaged in towing another vessel astern or alongside or by pushing it ahead.

(c) Every vessel issued a certificate to carry 50 or more passengers for hire, when engaged in trade.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 362, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

446.

Prior to entering the VTS area, every covered vessel shall report to the marine exchange the vessel’s name, call sign, location, course, speed, destination, estimated time of arrival, and any impairment to the operation or navigation of the vessel, and, while transiting the VTS area, every covered vessel shall comply with the requirements of Section 447.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 362, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

446.5.

The Ports of Los Angeles and Long Beach may impose fees upon all covered vessels within the VTS area to pay the cost of operating the vessel traffic service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 969, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

447.

The following vessels, while transiting the VTS area, shall comply with the requirements of Section 447.5:

(a) Every power-driven vessel of 20 meters or more in length.

(b) Every vessel of 100 gross tons or more carrying one or more passengers for hire.

(c) Every dredge and floating plant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 362, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

447.5.

While transiting the VTS area, every vessel described in Sections 445.5 and 447 shall do all of the following:

(a) Maintain continuous radio monitoring or communication with the marine exchange on the radio channel dedicated to the vessel traffic service.

(b) Respond promptly when hailed by the marine exchange.

(c) Communicate with the marine exchange in the English language.

(d) Comply with all VTS measures established by the marine exchange that do not conflict with federal and state statutes or regulations or the Los Angeles and Long Beach Harbor Safety Plan prepared pursuant to Section 8670.23.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 362, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

448.

The vessel traffic service shall be advisory in nature. Nothing in this article relieves, or is intended to relieve, any vessel, its owners, agents, charterers, operators, or other responsible or designated parties of command of the vessel or of any responsibilities they would otherwise have respecting the navigation and operation of any vessel. Each vessel within the VTS area shall be responsible for its safe navigation in accordance with the International Regulations for Preventing Collisions at Sea (1972) and any other international and local rules and regulations.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 447 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 362, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

448.5.

(a) It shall be understood and agreed, and shall be the essence of the marine exchange’s operation of the vessel traffic service, that the marine exchange act as agent of each vessel subject to the requirements of this article within the VTS area in providing vessel traffic information and performing all other acts incidental to operation of the vessel traffic service.

(b) No vessel subject to the requirements of this article shall assert any claim against the marine exchange or any officer, director, employee, or representative of the marine exchange for any damage, loss, or expense, including any rights of indemnity or other rights of any kind, sustained by the vessel or its owners, agents, charterers, operators, crew, or third parties arising out of, or connected with, directly or indirectly, the marine exchange’s operation of the vessel traffic service, even though resulting in whole or in part from negligent acts or omissions, of the marine exchange or any officer, director, employee, or representative of the marine exchange.

(c) Each vessel subject to the requirements of this article shall defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the marine exchange and its officers, directors, employees, and representatives from any and all claims, suits, or actions of any nature by whomsoever asserted, even though resulting or alleged to have resulted from negligent acts or omissions of the marine exchange or an officer, director, employee, or representative of the marine exchange.

(d) Nothing in subdivisions (b) and (c) shall affect liability or rights that may arise by reason of the gross negligence or intentional or willful misconduct of the marine exchange or an officer, director, employee, or representative of the marine exchange in the operation of the vessel traffic service.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 448 by Stats. 1996, Ch. 362, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

449.

(a) The marine exchange and its officers and directors are subject to Section 5047.5 of the Corporations Code to the extent that the marine exchange meets the criteria specified in that section.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to include the marine exchange or its officers, directors, employees, or representatives within the meaning of “responsible party” as defined in Section 8670.3 of the Government Code and subdivision (p) of Section 8750 of the Public Resources Code for the purposes of the Lempert-Keene-Seastrand Oil Spill Prevention and Response Act (Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 8574.1) of Chapter 7 and Chapter 7.4 (commencing with Section 8670.1) of Division 1
 of Title 2 of the Government Code and Division 7.8 (commencing with Section 8750) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 61.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

449.3.

The marine exchange shall cooperate fully with the administrator appointed pursuant to Section 8670.4 of the Government Code in the development and implementation of the vessel traffic service system required by Section 8670.21 of the Government Code. Upon certification by the administrator that, pursuant to Section 8670.21, the Coast Guard has commenced operation of a fully federally funded vessel traffic service system for the Los Angeles/Long Beach harbor, the authorization contained in Section 445 for the marine exchange to operate a vessel traffic service is revoked.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 796, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

449.5.

(a) Upon request by the administrator, the marine exchange shall submit a complete description and operational status report of the vessel traffic service. After a public hearing, the administrator shall, in accordance with paragraph (8) of subdivision (f) of Section 8670.21 of the Government Code, determine whether the elements and operation of the vessel traffic service are consistent with the harbor safety plan for the Los Angeles and Long Beach harbors developed pursuant to Section 8670.23.1 of the Government Code and the standards of a statewide vessel traffic service plan or system developed pursuant to Section 8670.21 of the Government Code.

(b) If, pursuant to subdivision (a), the administrator determines that the vessel traffic service is inconsistent with the harbor safety plan for the Los Angeles and Long Beach harbors developed pursuant to Section 8670.23.1 of the Government Code and the standards of a statewide vessel traffic service plan or vessel traffic monitoring and communications system developed pursuant to Section 8670.21 of the Government Code, the administrator shall issue an order to the marine exchange which specifies modifications to the vessel traffic service to eliminate the inconsistencies.

(c) If the marine exchange has not complied with an order within six months of issuance, then the administrator, after a public hearing, may take any or all of the following actions: 

(1) Impose on the marine exchange an administrative fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day the marine exchange does not comply with the administrator’s order. 

(2) Administratively revoke the authorization provided to the marine exchange by Section 445 to operate the vessel traffic service. 

(d) If authorization for the marine exchange to operate the vessel traffic service is revoked pursuant to this section, the administrator shall take any action that is necessary to expeditiously establish a vessel traffic service for the Los Angeles and Long Beach harbors. The action may include the assessment of fees on vessels, port users, and ports, and the making of needed expenditures, as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 8670.21.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 796, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Civil Actions and Liens [450. - 509.]



  ARTICLE 1. Bottomry [450. - 462.]

450.

Bottomry is a contract by which a vessel or its freightage is hypothecated as security for a loan, which is to be repaid only if the vessel survives a particular risk, voyage, or period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

451.

The owner of a vessel may hypothecate it or its freightage, upon bottomry, for any lawful purpose, and at any time and place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

452.

The master of a vessel may hypothecate it upon bottomry only for the purpose of procuring repairs or supplies which are necessary for accomplishing the objects of the voyage, or for securing the safety of the vessel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

453.

The master of a vessel can hypothecate it upon bottomry only when he can not otherwise relieve the necessities of the vessel, and is unable to reach adequate funds of the owner, or to obtain any funds upon the personal credit of the owner, and when previous communication with the owner is precluded by the urgent necessity of the case.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

454.

The master of a vessel may hypothecate freightage upon bottomry, under the same circumstances as those which authorize an hypothecation of the vessel by him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

455.

Upon a contract of bottomry, the parties may lawfully stipulate for a rate of interest higher than that allowed by the law upon other contracts. But a competent court may reduce the rate stipulated when it appears unjustifiable and exorbitant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

456.

A lender upon a contract of bottomry, made by the master of a vessel, as such, may enforce the contract, though the circumstances necessary to authorize the master to hypothecate the vessel did not in fact exist, if, after due diligence and inquiry, the lender had reasonable grounds to believe, and did in good faith believe, in the existence of such circumstances.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

457.

A stipulation in a contract of bottomry, imposing any liability for the loan independent of the maritime risks, is void.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

458.

If there is a total loss of the thing hypothecated, from a risk to which the loan was subject, the lender upon bottomry can recover nothing; if a partial loss, he can recover only to the extent of the net value to the owner of the part saved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

459.

Unless it is otherwise expressly agreed, a bottomry loan becomes due immediately upon the termination of the risk, although a term of credit is specified in the contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

460.

A bottomry lien is independent of possession, and is lost by omission to enforce it within a reasonable time.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

461.

A bottomry lien, if created out of a real or apparent necessity, in good faith, is preferred to every other lien or claim upon the same thing, excepting only a lien for seamen’s wages, a subsequent lien of material-men for supplies or repairs indispensable to the safety of the vessel, and a subsequent lien for salvage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

462.

Of two or more bottomry liens on the same subject, the latter in date has preference, if created out of necessity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Respondentia [470. - 474.]

470.

Respondentia is a contract by which all or part of a cargo is hypothecated as security for a loan, the repayment of which is dependent on maritime risks.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

471.

The owner of cargo may hypothecate it upon respondentia, at any time and place, and for any purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

472.

The master of a vessel may hypothecate its cargo upon respondentia only if all of the following conditions exist:

(a) He would be authorized to hypothecate the vessel and freightage.

(b) He is unable to borrow sufficient money on the vessel and freightage for repairs or supplies which are necessary for the successful accomplishment of the voyage.

(c) There is a reasonable prospect of benefiting the cargo.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

473.

The owner of a vessel is bound to repay to the owner of its cargo all which the latter is compelled to pay in order to discharge a lien under a contract of respondentia made by the master.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

474.

The provisions of sections 455 to 462 of this code apply equally to loans on respondentia.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Actions Against Vessels [490. - 497.]

490.

Debts amounting to at least fifty dollars ($50), contracted for the benefit of vessels, are liens in the cases provided in Section 491.

Actions for any of the causes specified in Section 491 shall be brought against the owners by name, if known, but if not known, that fact shall be stated in the complaint, and the defendants shall be designated as unknown owners. Other persons having a lien upon the vessel may be made defendants to the action, the nature and amount of such lien being stated in the complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1341.)
-------------------------------------------

491.

All vessels are liable for:

(a) Services rendered on board at the request of, or under contract with, their respective owners, masters, agents, or consignees.

(b) Supplies furnished in this State for their use, at the request of their respective owners, masters, agents, or consignees.

(c) Work done or materials furnished in this State for their construction, repair, or equipment.

(d) Their wharfage and anchorage within this State.

(e) Breach of any contract for the transportation of persons or property between places within this State, made by their respective owners, masters, agents, or consignees.

(f) Injuries caused by them to persons or property, in this State.

Demands for these several causes constitute liens upon all vessels, have priority in the order enumerated, and have preference over all other demands; but such liens only continue in force for the period of one year from the time the cause of action accrued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

492.

The master of a vessel has a general lien, independent of possession, upon the vessel and freightage, for advances necessarily made or liability necessarily incurred by him for the benefit of the vessel, but he has no lien for wages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

493.

The mate and seamen of a vessel have a general lien, independent of possession, upon the vessel and freightage, for their wages, which is superior to every other lien.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

494.

The cost of repairing or replacing any buoy or beacon which is maintained by authority of the United States Bureau of Lighthouses which may be misplaced, damaged, or destroyed by any vessel being made fast to it, is, when the cost is legally ascertained, a lien upon the vessel, and is recoverable against it and its owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

495.

In any action brought pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the complaint shall designate the vessel by name, and shall be verified by the oath of the plaintiff, or someone on his behalf.

The summons and copy of the complaint shall be served on the owners if they can be found; otherwise, they may be served on the master, mate, or person having charge of the vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1341.)
-------------------------------------------

495.1.

Notwithstanding Section 483.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the plaintiff, at the time of issuing the summons, or at any time afterwards, may have the vessel, with its tackle, appurtenances, appliances, furnishings, and furniture, attached as security for the satisfaction of any judgment that may be recovered in the action. A writ of attachment may be issued in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure without the showing required by Section 485.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1516.)
-------------------------------------------

495.3.

The writ shall be directed to the sheriff of the county within which the vessel lies, or the marshal of the court, and direct him or her to attach the vessel, with its tackle, appurtenances, appliances, furnishings, and furniture, and keep the same in his or her custody until discharged in due course of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 93.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

495.4.

The sheriff or marshal to whom the writ is directed and delivered shall execute it without delay, and shall attach and keep in his or her custody the vessel, named therein, with its tackle, appurtenances, appliances, furnishings, and furniture, until discharged in due course of law; but the sheriff or marshal is not authorized by any such writ to interfere with the discharge of any merchandise on board of the vessel or with the removal of any trunks or other property of passengers, or of the captain, mate, seamen, steward, cook, or other persons employed on board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

495.5.

The owner, or the master agent, or consignee of the vessel, may, on behalf of the owner, appear and answer or plead to the action and may object to the undertaking filed on behalf of the plaintiff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

495.6.

After the attachment is levied, the owner, or the master, agent, or consignee of the vessel, may, in behalf of the owner, have the attachment discharged, upon filing with the court, subject to the provisions of Section 489.060 of the Code of Civil Procedure, an undertaking in an amount sufficient to satisfy the demand in the suit, besides costs. Upon receiving notice of the filing of the undertaking with the court, the sheriff or marshal shall restore to the owner, or the master, agent, or consignee of the owner, the vessel attached.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 95.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

495.7.

After the appearance in the action of the owner, the attachment may, on motion, also be discharged in the same manner, and on like terms and conditions, as attachments in other cases, subject to the provisions of Section 495.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1341.)
-------------------------------------------

495.8.

If the attachment is not discharged, and a judgment is recovered in the action in favor of the plaintiff, and an execution is issued thereon, the sheriff or marshal shall sell at public auction, after publication of notice pursuant to Section 6062 of the Government Code, the vessel, with its tackle, appurtenances, appliances, furnishings, and furniture, or such interest therein as may be necessary, and shall apply the proceeds of the sale as follows:

(a) When the action is brought for demands other than the wages of mariners, boatmen, and others employed in the service of the vessel sold, to the payment of the amount of those wages, as specified in the execution.

(b) To the payment of the judgment and costs, including his or her fees.

The sheriff or marshal shall pay any balance remaining to the owner, or to the master, agent, or consignee who may have appeared on behalf of the owner, or if there is no appearance, then into court, subject to the claim of any party or parties legally entitled thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

495.9.

Any mariner, boatman, or other person employed in the service of the vessel attached, who may wish to assert his or her claim for wages against the vessel, the attachments being issued for other demands than those wages, may file an affidavit of his or her claim, setting forth the amount and the particular service rendered, with the clerk of the court; and thereafter no attachment can be discharged upon filing an undertaking, unless the amount of the claim, or the amount determined as provided in Section 496, is covered thereby, in addition to the other requirements; and any execution issued against that vessel, upon judgment recovered thereafter shall direct the application of the proceeds of any sale:

(a) To the payment of the amount of such claims filed, or the amount determined, as provided in Section 496, which amount the clerk shall insert in the writ. 

(b) To the payment of the judgment and costs, and sheriff’s or marshal’s fees, and shall direct the payment of any balance to the owner, master, or consignee, who may have appeared in the action; but if no appearance by them is made therein, it shall direct a deposit of the balance in court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

496.

If the claim of the mariner, boatman, or other person filed with the clerk of the court, as provided in Section 495.9, is not contested within five days after notice of the filing thereof by the owner, master, agent, or consignee of the vessel against which the claim is filed, or by any creditor, it shall be deemed admitted; but if contested, the clerk shall indorse upon the affidavit thereof a statement that it is contested, and the grounds of the contest, and shall immediately thereafter order the matter to a single referee for his determination, or he may hear the proofs and determine the matter himself. The determination of the clerk or referee may be reviewed by a court in which the action is pending or a judge thereof immediately after such determination is made, and the judgment of the court or judge is final. On the review the court or judge may use the minutes of the evidence taken by the clerk or referee, or may take the evidence anew.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1341.)
-------------------------------------------

497.

The notice of sale published by the sheriff or marshal must contain a statement of the measurement and tonnage of the vessel and a general description of her condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Boaters Lien Law [500. - 509.]

500.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Boaters Lien Law”.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

501.

As used in this article:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles or any successor agency thereto which registers vehicles.

(b) “Mail” means first-class mail, postage prepaid, unless registered mail is specified. Registered mail includes certified mail.

(c) “Services” means the making of repairs or performing labor upon or to, and the furnishing of supplies or materials for, any vessel or any trailer used in connection with a vessel.

(d) “Storage” means the safekeeping, mooring, berthage, wharfage, or anchorage of a vessel and the providing of parking space for any trailer used in connection with the vessel.

(e) “Vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water or a floating home, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on the water and required to be registered, excluding any vessel which has a valid marine document issued by the United States or any agency thereof. For the purposes of this article, “vessel” includes any trailer used in connection with the vessel which is in the possession of the lienholder at the time the lien arises.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

501.3.

The time a notice or statement is given or sent, unless otherwise expressly provided, means the time a written notice to a person is deposited in the United States mails; or the time any other written notice is personally delivered to the recipient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

501.5.

The possessory vessel lien procedures described by the provisions of this article shall supersede any local ordinance and shall provide the exclusive means of enforcing these liens. Nothing in this article shall be construed as affecting any maritime lien cognizable under any federal law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 941, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

502.

(a) Except as provided in Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 410) of Chapter 1 of Division 3, every person has a lien dependent upon possession of the vessel for the compensation to which he or she is legally entitled for services rendered to or storage of any vessel subject to registration with the Department of Motor Vehicles. The lien shall arise at the time a written statement of lien is sent to the registered owner of the vessel which specifies the charges for services or storage rendered and states that the vessel is subject to sale pursuant to the California Boater’s Lien Law.
